Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.540

Federal statutes controlling.

If a congressional measure, which submits to the several states an amendment to the Constitution of the United States for ratification or rejection, provides for or requires a different method of calling and holding conventions to ratify or reject said amendment, the requirements of said congressional measure shall be followed so far as they conflict with the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1443. Prior: 1965 c 9 s 29.74.150; prior: 1933 c 181 s 11; RRS s 5249-11. Formerly RCW 29.74.150.]